data/spelling-dict/hunspell/pt_PT_90.aff
SFX P   er              ê-lo            er              +G=m,N=s
SFX P   er              ê-la            er              +G=f,N=s
SFX P   er              ê-los           er              +G=m,N=p
SFX P   er              ê-las           er              +G=f,N=p
SFX P   er              ê-la-á          [^mr][^abrs]ter              +P=3,N=s,T=f
SFX P   er              ê-la-ás         [^mr][^abrs]ter              +P=2,N=s,T=f
SFX P   er              ê-la-ão         [^mr][^abrs]ter              +P=3,N=p,T=f
SFX P   er              ê-la-ia         [^mr][^abrs]ter              +P=1_3,N=s,T=c
SFX P   er              ê-la-ias        [^mr][^abrs]ter              +P=2,N=s,T=c
SFX P   er              ê-la-íamos      [^mr][^abrs]ter              +P=1,N=p,T=c
SFX P   er              ê-la-iam        [^mr][^abrs]ter              +P=3,N=p,T=c
SFX P   er              ê-las-á         [^mr][^abrs]ter              +P=3,N=s,T=f
SFX P   er              ê-las-ás        [^mr][^abrs]ter              +P=2,N=s,T=f
SFX P   er              ê-las-ei        [^mr][^abrs]ter              +P=1,N=s,T=f
SFX P   er              ê-las-eis       [^mr][^abrs]ter              +P=2,N=p,T=f
SFX P   er              ê-las-ão        [^mr][^abrs]ter              +P=3,N=p,T=f
SFX P   er              ê-las-ia        [^mr][^abrs]ter              +P=1_3,N=s,T=c
SFX P   er              ê-las-ias       [^mr][^abrs]ter              +P=2,N=s,T=c
SFX P   er              ê-las-íamos     [^mr][^abrs]ter              +P=1,N=p,T=c
SFX P   er              ê-las-iam       [^mr][^abrs]ter              +P=3,N=p,T=c
SFX P   er              ê-lo-ei         er              +P=1,N=s,T=f
SFX P   er              ê-lo-ás         er              +P=2,N=s,T=f
SFX P   er              ê-lo-á          er              +P=3,N=s,T=f
SFX P   er              ê-lo-emos       er              +P=1,N=p,T=f
SFX P   er              ê-lo-eis        er              +P=2,N=p,T=f
SFX P   er              ê-lo-ão         er              +P=3,N=p,T=f
SFX P   er              ê-lo-ia         er              +P=1_3,N=s,T=c
SFX P   er              ê-lo-ias        er              +P=2,N=s,T=c
SFX P   er              ê-lo-íamos      er              +P=1,N=p,T=c
SFX P   er              ê-lo-íeis       er              +P=2,N=p,T=c
SFX P   er              ê-lo-iam        er              +P=3,N=p,T=c
SFX P   er              ê-los-á         [^mr][^abrs]ter              +P=3,N=s,T=f
SFX P   er              ê-los-ei        [^mr][^abrs]ter              +P=1,N=s,T=f
SFX P   er              ê-los-eis       [^mr][^abrs]ter              +P=2,N=p,T=f
SFX P   er              ê-los-ão        [^mr][^abrs]ter              +P=3,N=p,T=f
SFX P   er              ê-los-ia        [^mr][^abrs]ter              +P=1_3,N=s,T=c
SFX P   er              ê-los-ias       [^mr][^abrs]ter              +P=2,N=s,T=c
SFX P   er              ê-los-íamos     [^mr][^abrs]ter              +P=1,N=p,T=c
SFX P   er              ê-los-iam       [^mr][^abrs]ter              +P=3,N=p,T=c
SFX P   zer             -lo          dizer           +P=1,N=s,T=f
SFX P   zer             -la          dizer           +P=1,N=s,T=f
SFX P   zer             -los          dizer           +P=1,N=s,T=f
SFX P   zer             -las          dizer           +P=1,N=s,T=f
SFX P   r             mo-lo          dizer           +P=1,N=s,T=f
SFX P   r             mo-la          dizer           +P=1,N=s,T=f
SFX P   r             mo-los          dizer           +P=1,N=s,T=f
SFX P   r             mo-las          dizer           +P=1,N=s,T=f
SFX P   r             mo-nos          dizer           +P=1,N=s,T=f
SFX P   zer             -lo-ei          dizer           +P=1,N=s,T=f
SFX P   zer             -lo-ás          dizer           +P=2,N=s,T=f
SFX P   zer             -lo-á           dizer           +P=3,N=s,T=f
SFX P   zer             -lo-emos        dizer           +P=1,N=p,T=f
SFX P   zer             -lo-eis         dizer           +P=2,N=p,T=f
SFX P   zer             -lo-ão          dizer           +P=3,N=p,T=f
SFX P   zer             -lo-ia          dizer           +P=1_3,N=s,T=c
SFX P   zer             -lo-ias         dizer           +P=2,N=s,T=c
SFX P   zer             -lo-íamos       dizer           +P=1,N=p,T=c
SFX P   zer             -lo-íeis        dizer           +P=2,N=p,T=c
SFX P   zer             -lo-iam         dizer           +P=3,N=p,T=c
SFX P   zer             -los-ei          dizer           +P=1,N=s,T=f
SFX P   zer             -los-ás          dizer           +P=2,N=s,T=f
SFX P   zer             -los-á           dizer           +P=3,N=s,T=f
SFX P   zer             -los-emos        dizer           +P=1,N=p,T=f
SFX P   zer             -los-eis         dizer           +P=2,N=p,T=f
SFX P   zer             -los-ão          dizer           +P=3,N=p,T=f
SFX P   zer             -los-ia          dizer           +P=1_3,N=s,T=c
SFX P   zer             -los-ias         dizer           +P=2,N=s,T=c
SFX P   zer             -los-íamos       dizer           +P=1,N=p,T=c
SFX P   zer             -los-íeis        dizer           +P=2,N=p,T=c
SFX P   zer             -los-iam         dizer           +P=3,N=p,T=c
SFX P   zer             -la-ei          dizer           +P=1,N=s,T=f
SFX P   zer             -la-ás          dizer           +P=2,N=s,T=f
SFX P   zer             -la-á           dizer           +P=3,N=s,T=f
SFX P   zer             -la-emos        dizer           +P=1,N=p,T=f
SFX P   zer             -la-eis         dizer           +P=2,N=p,T=f
SFX P   zer             -la-ão          dizer           +P=3,N=p,T=f
SFX P   zer             -la-ia          dizer           +P=1_3,N=s,T=c
SFX P   zer             -la-ias         dizer           +P=2,N=s,T=c
SFX P   zer             -la-íamos       dizer           +P=1,N=p,T=c
SFX P   zer             -la-íeis        dizer           +P=2,N=p,T=c
SFX P   zer             -la-iam         dizer           +P=3,N=p,T=c
SFX P   zer             -las-ei          dizer           +P=1,N=s,T=f
SFX P   zer             -las-ás          dizer           +P=2,N=s,T=f
SFX P   zer             -las-á           dizer           +P=3,N=s,T=f
SFX P   zer             -las-emos        dizer           +P=1,N=p,T=f
SFX P   zer             -las-eis         dizer           +P=2,N=p,T=f
SFX P   zer             -las-ão          dizer           +P=3,N=p,T=f
SFX P   zer             -las-ia          dizer           +P=1_3,N=s,T=c
SFX P   zer             -las-ias         dizer           +P=2,N=s,T=c
SFX P   zer             -las-íamos       dizer           +P=1,N=p,T=c
SFX P   zer             -las-íeis        dizer           +P=2,N=p,T=c
SFX P   zer             -las-iam         dizer           +P=3,N=p,T=c
SFX P   zer             r-lhe-ei          dizer           +P=1,N=s,T=f
SFX P   zer             r-lhe-ás          dizer           +P=2,N=s,T=f
SFX P   zer             r-lhe-á           dizer           +P=3,N=s,T=f
SFX P   zer             r-lhe-emos        dizer           +P=1,N=p,T=f
SFX P   zer             r-lhe-eis         dizer           +P=2,N=p,T=f
SFX P   zer             r-lhe-ão          dizer           +P=3,N=p,T=f
SFX P   zer             r-lhe-ia          dizer           +P=1_3,N=s,T=c
SFX P   zer             r-lhe-ias         dizer           +P=2,N=s,T=c
SFX P   zer             r-lhe-íamos       dizer           +P=1,N=p,T=c
SFX P   zer             r-lhe-íeis        dizer           +P=2,N=p,T=c
SFX P   zer             r-lhe-iam         dizer           +P=3,N=p,T=c
SFX P   zer             r-lhes-ei          dizer           +P=1,N=s,T=f
SFX P   zer             r-lhes-ás          dizer           +P=2,N=s,T=f
SFX P   zer             r-lhes-á           dizer           +P=3,N=s,T=f
SFX P   zer             r-lhes-emos        dizer           +P=1,N=p,T=f
SFX P   zer             r-lhes-eis         dizer           +P=2,N=p,T=f
SFX P   zer             r-lhes-ão          dizer           +P=3,N=p,T=f
SFX P   zer             r-lhes-ia          dizer           +P=1_3,N=s,T=c
