data/spelling-dict/hunspell/pt_PT_90.dic
abençoar/XYPLD
abreviar/XYPLcBMD
acariciar/XYPLDn
acicatar/XYPL
acompadrar/XYPL
ativar/XYPLRScDn
adir/XYPLc
adquirir/XYPLRcDv
afigurar/XYPLc
afortunar/XYPLB
agilizar/XYPLnc
aguçar/XYPLMD
alacaiar/XYPL
aldrabar/XYPLc
algemar/XYPL
aloirar/XYPL
amaldiçoar/XYPLD
ameigar/XYPLD
amontanhar/XYPL
anafar/XYPL
anilhar/XYPL
antever/PL
apaniguar/YPL
apeganhar/XYPL
aplicar/XYPLcnvB
apreciar/XYPLScMDvR
apunhalar/XYPLn
argamassar/XYPLD
arrebatar/XYPLMDnB
arremessar/XYPLMD
arterializar/XYPLc
assegurar/XYPLcDv
assoldadar/XYPL
atar/XYPLcMD
atolar/XYPL
atribular/XYPLcD
autopsiar/XYPL
avigorar/XYPL
azotar/XYPL
banalizar/XYPLc
beber/XYPLDv
bipartir/XYPLcv
bouçar/XYPL
burrificar/XYPL
caldeirar/XYPL
cantarejar/XYPL
carnalizar/XYPLc
catequizar/XYPLcDn
centrifugar/XYPLcD
chapar/XYPL
chuchar/XYPL
circuncidar/XYPL
clivar/XYPL
cochichar/XYPLD
colorir/YPLS
comparar/XYPLcDv
compungir/XYPLM
condicionar/XYPLMDn
congeminar/XYPLcn
consolidar/XYPLRcnv
continuar/XYPLScDB
contraprovar/XYPL
copiar/XYPLD
cortejar/XYPLD
criminalizar/XYPLSDc
cumprimentar/XYPLD
debelar/XYPLcD
decorar/XYPLcDvR
degustar/XYPLc
demonstrar/XYPLcDnv
depravar/XYPLcD
desaforar/XYPLM
desapropriar/XYPLDnM
desautorizar/XYPLc
descarar/XYPLM
desconcertar/XYPLDn
desdentar/XYPL
desencarrilar/XYPL
desengrainhar/XYPL
desenvencilhar/XYPL
desfocar/XYPL
desincorporar/XYPLc
desmandar/XYPLM
desorganizar/XYPLcD
despicar/XYPL
desratar/XYPL
desusar/XYPL
detestar/XYPLcv
dignificar/XYPLcDn
dissipar/XYPLcDv
dobar/XYPL
dulcificar/XYPL
eleger/XYPLR
embaralhar/XYPLc
embicar/XYPL
embutir/XYPLD
empastar/XYPLM
empreender/XYPLMD
encalhar/XYPLScM
encarnar/XYPLcD
encerar/XYPLcMD
encontrar/XYPLRS
endemizar/XYPL
enfarruscar/XYPL
enfronhar/XYPL
engordurar/XYPLSM
enluvar/XYPL
enrubescer/XYPLM
entalhar/XYPLMD
entrar/XYPLR
envaidar/XYPL
enxugar/XYPLM
esboroar/XYPLM
escaqueirar/XYPL
escorrer/XYPLM
esfolar/XYPLMD
esmigalhar/XYPLM
especializar/XYPLc
esponjar/XYPL
estacar/XYPL
estivar/XYPLcD
estribar/XYPLM
eternizar/XYPL
exclamar/XYPLcD
expiar/XYPLcDv
extravasar/XYPLM
familiarizar/XYPLc
fecundar/XYPLcDn
filigranar/XYPL
fletir/YPL
forrar/XYPLcMD
fresar/XYPLD
galicizar/XYPL
gelificar/XYPL
gorgolejar/XYPLn
guardear/ZYPLM
hidrogenar/XYPLc
humildar/XYPL
imbecilizar/XYPL
importunar/XYPLcD
incandescer/XYPLn
incubar/XYPLcD
indrominar/XYPL
infernizar/XYPL
inovar/XYPLcD
instar/XYPLnv
intercetar/XYPLc
introverter/XYPL
irisar/XYPLD
juramentar/XYPL
lambuzar/XYPL
lecionar/XYPLcD
licitar/XYPLcDn
lograr/XYPLcMD
macular/XYPLDv
mancar/XYPL
maravilhar/XYPL
materializar/XYPLScDn
medrar/XYPL
merecer/XYPLSMDB
militarizar/XYPLSc
misturar/XYPLRDv
mondar/XYPL
mostrengar/XYPL
namorar/XYPLcMD
ninar/XYPL
obliterar/XYPLcn
oferendar/XYPL
opinar/XYPLnv
orquestrar/XYPLc
padejar/XYPLD
parafinar/XYPL
passar/XYPLDn
pelejar/XYPL
percutir/XYPLD
perpetuar/XYPLcBD
pilotar/XYPL
plebiscitar/XYPL
porfiar/XYPLD
praticar/XYPLDnv
prefixar/XYPLc
prescrever/XYPL
privar/XYPLc
proletarizar/XYPL
prosperar/XYPL
purpurar/XYPL
quimificar/XYPL
ralar/XYPLcD
rastrear/ZYPL
reanimar/XYPLcD
rebolir/YPL
recetar/XYPLDc
recopiar/XYPL
redigir/XYPL
refiar/XYPL
regar/XYPLD
reiniciar/XYPL
relvar/XYPL
remontar/XYPLn
repassar/XYPL
reproduzir/ZYPLv
resfolegar/XYPLn
resselar/XYPL
retesar/XYPLMD
reunificar/XYPLc
revistar/XYPLD
robustecer/XYPLMD
ruminar/XYPLcn
salificar/XYPLcv
sarrabiscar/XYPL
segundar/XYPL
seringar/XYPLD
sindicalizar/XYPLc
sobreaquecer/XYPLMDv
sondar/XYPLDv
subtilizar/XYPLD
sussurrar/XYPLnD
tempestear/ZYPL
topografar/XYPL
translucidar/XYPL
tripular/XYPL
valsar/XYPLD
vidrar/XYPLMD
voluntariar/XYPL
pressentem/PL
investe/PLRS
servimos/PL
transgredi/PL
averiguai/PL
coíbo/PL
descobris/RPL
desimpede/PL
instruíeis/PL
instruíssem/PL
ponham/PLR
compus/PLR
comporiam/PLR
corroeremos/PL
moas/PL
moeríeis/PL
remoerás/PL
roem/PL
roerias/PL
persigamos/PL
dáveis/PL
désseis/PL
vês/PL
reviam/PL
revísseis/PL
previu/PL
entreveis/PL
entrevejamos/PL
terias/PL
tivessem/PL
detinhas/PL
deterem/PL
mantiveram/PL
obtereis/PL
obtivesse/PL
retemos/PL
retende/PL
tragais/PL
havia/PL
hajas/PL
sida/PL
crashar/XYP
clausular/LPXYmp
jantar/LPXYlp
serão/LPlp
revires/LP
